Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-5,125
Insurance company; request for information; effect.

Any insurance company providing information to an authorized agency or agencies pursuant to section 81-5,121 or 81-5,123 shall have the right to request relevant information and receive, within a reasonable time not to exceed thirty days, the information requested.

Laws 1979, LB 301, § 11.